th: ขนาดบริเวณลูกไม้: 13x1 T-part; 13x4 ด้านหน้า; 13x6 ด้านหน้า; 360 ด้านหน้า; แผ่นปิด 4x4; แผ่นปิด 5x5; แผ่นปิด 6x5; ลูกไม้เต็ม; T-part; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Renda área tamanho: T-part 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Closure 4x4; Closure 5x5; Closure 6x5; Full lace; T-part; Outro
tr: Dantel bölgesi beden: 13x1 T ayrım; 13x4 ön; 13x6 ön; 360 ön; 4x4 kapama; 5x5 kapama; 6x5 kapama; Tam dantel; T ayrım; Diğer
en: Lace area size: 13x1 T-part; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Full lace; T-part; Other
lt-LT: Nėrinių zonos dydis: 13x1 T formos dalis; 13x4 priekinė dalis; 13x6 priekinė dalis; 360 priekinė dalis; 4x4 uždarymas; 5x5 uždarymas; 6x5 uždarymas; Visiškai nėriniuota; T formos dalis; Kita
it: Misura dell'area in pizzo: Parte T 13x1; Frontale 13x4; Frontale 13x6; Frontale 360; Chiusura 4x4; Chiusura 5x5; Chiusura 6x5; Lace completo; Parte T; Altro
nb: Størrelse på blondefelt: 13x1 T-del; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Full lace; T-del; Annet
hu: Tüllfelület mérete: 13x1-es T-választék; 13x4-es frontális rész; 13x6-os frontális rész; 360-as frontális rész; 4x4-es zárórész; 5x5-ös zárórész; 6x5-ös zárórész; Teljes csipke; T-választék; Egyéb
sk-SK: Veľkosť čipkovanej oblasti: 13x1 T-part; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Full lace; T-part; Iné
bg-BG: Размер на зоната с връзки: 13x1 T-part; 13x4 фронтална част; 13x6 фронтална част; 360 фронтална част; 4x4 затваряща част; 5x5 затваряща част; 6x5 затваряща част; Изцяло от дантела; T-образна част; Друго
hr-HR: Veličina područja vezice: 13x1 T-dijeljenje; 13x4 frontalno; 13x6 frontalno; 360 frontalno; 4x4 zatvaranje; 5x5 zatvaranje; 6x5 zatvaranje; Puna čipka; T-dijeljenje; Ostalo
fr: Taille de la zone en dentelle: Partie en T 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Closure 4x4; Closure 5x5; Closure 6x5; Full lace; Partie en T; Autre
ru: Размер области кружева: T-образный пробор 13x1; Фронтальная часть 13x4; Фронтальная часть 13x6; Фронтальная часть 360; Накладка 4x4; Накладка 5x5; Накладка 6x5; Полностью на сетке; Т-образный пробор; Другое
ja: レース部分のサイズ: 13x1 Tパーツ; 13x4 フロンタル; 13x6 フロンタル; 360 フロンタル; 4x4 クロージャー; 5x5 クロージャー; 6x5 クロージャー; フルレース; Tパーツ; その他
pt-PT: Tamanho da área da renda: Peça em T 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Fecho 4x4; Fecho 5x5; Fecho 6x5; Renda completa; Peça em T; Outro
pl: Rozmiar obszaru koronki: 13x1 T-part; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Closure 4x4; Closure 5x5; Closure 6x5; Full lace; T-part; Inne
de: Größe des Lace-Bereichs: 13x1 T-Part; 13x4 Frontal; 13x6 Frontal; 360 Frontal; 4x4 Closure; 5x5 Closure; 6x5 Closure; Full Lace; T-Part; Sonstige
ko: 레이스 부분 사이즈: 13x1 T 파트; 13x4 프론탈; 13x6 프론탈; 360 프론탈; 4x4 클로저; 5x5 클로저; 6x5 클로저; 풀 레이스; T 파트; 기타
zh-CN: 鞋带孔区域尺寸: 13x1 T 字区; 13x4 前额蕾丝; 13x6 前额蕾丝; 360 环形蕾丝; 4x4 闭合块; 5x5 闭合块; 6x5 闭合块; 全蕾丝; T 字区; 其他
nl: Kant gedeelte maat: 13x1 T-deel; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 sluiting; 5x5 sluiting; 6x5 sluiting; Volledig kant; T-deel; Overig
cs: Velikost krajkové oblasti: 13×1 T-part; Čelní díl 13×4; Čelní díl 13×6; Čelní díl 360; Zakončení 4×4; Zakončení 5×5; Zakončení 6×5; Celá krajka; T-part; Jiné
fi: Nauha-alueen koko: 13x1 T-jakaus; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360-etuosa; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Kokopitsi; T-jakaus; Muu
da: Størrelsen på snøreområdet: 13x1 T-part; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Full lace; T-part; Andet
zh-TW: 蕾絲網區域尺寸: 13x1 T 字部位; 13x4 前蕾絲; 13x6 前蕾絲; 360 環繞蕾絲; 4x4 頂部蕾絲; 5x5 頂部蕾絲; 6x5 頂部蕾絲; 全蕾絲; T 字部位; 其他
sv: Spetsområdets storlek: 13x1 T-bena; 13x4 frontal; 13x6 frontal; 360 frontal; 4x4 closure; 5x5 closure; 6x5 closure; Full lace; T-bena; Övrigt
vi: Kích thước vùng ren: Ngôi chữ T 13x1; Phủ trán 13x4; Phủ trán 13x6; Phủ vòng 360; Phủ đỉnh 4x4; Phủ đỉnh 5x5; Phủ đỉnh 6x5; Lưới trùm toàn đầu; Ngôi chữ T; Khác
sl-SI: Velikost predela s čipko: 13x1 T-del; 13x4 frontalni del; 13x6 frontalni del; 360 frontalni del; 4x4 zapiralni del; 5x5 zapiralni del; 6x5 zapiralni del; Polna čipka; T-del; Drugo
el: Μέγεθος περιοχής δαντέλας: T-part 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Closure 4x4; Closure 5x5; Closure 6x5; Full lace; T-part; Άλλο
es: Tamaño del área de encaje: Parte en T 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Cierre 4x4; Cierre 5x5; Cierre 6x5; Encaje completo; Parte en T; Otro
ro-RO: Dimensiunea zonei șiretului: T-part 13x1; Frontal 13x4; Frontal 13x6; Frontal 360; Closure 4x4; Closure 5x5; Closure 6x5; Dantelă completă; T-part; Altele